src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON STIGE
          stige+V+Inf:stige    # ;
          stige+V+Imp:stig     # ;
      stige+V+Ind+Prs:stiger   # ;
 stige+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stiges   # ;
      stige+V+Ind+Prt:steig    # ;
      stige+V+Ind+Prt:steg     # ;
       stige+V+PrfPtc:steget   # ;
       stige+V+PrsPtc:stigende # ;

LEXICON STIKKE
          stikke+V+Inf:stikke    # ;
          stikke+V+Imp:stikk     # ;
      stikke+V+Ind+Prs:stikker   # ;
 stikke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stikkes   # ;
      stikke+V+Ind+Prt:stakk     # ;
       stikke+V+PrfPtc:stukket   # ;
       stikke+V+PrsPtc:stikkende # ;

LEXICON STJELE
          stjele+V+Inf:stjele    # ;
          stjele+V+Imp:stjel     # ;
      stjele+V+Ind+Prs:stjeler   # ;
 stjele+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stjeles   # ;
      stjele+V+Ind+Prt:stjal     # ;
       stjele+V+PrfPtc:stjålet   # ;
       stjele+V+PrsPtc:stjelende # ;

LEXICON STREKKE
          strekke+V+Inf:strekke    # ;
          strekke+V+Imp:strekk     # ;
      strekke+V+Ind+Prs:strekker   # ;
 strekke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:strekkes   # ;
      strekke+V+Ind+Prt:strekk     # ;
       strekke+V+PrfPtc:strekk     # ;
       strekke+V+PrsPtc:strekkende # ;

LEXICON STRIDE
          stride+V+Inf:stride    # ;
          stride+V+Imp:strid     # ;
      stride+V+Ind+Prs:strider   # ;
 stride+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:strides   # ;
      stride+V+Ind+Prt:stred     # ;
       stride+V+PrfPtc:stritt    # ;
       stride+V+PrsPtc:stridende # ;

LEXICON STRYKE
          stryke+V+Inf:stryke    # ;
          stryke+V+Imp:stryk     # ;
      stryke+V+Ind+Prs:stryker   # ;
 stryke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:strykes   # ;
      stryke+V+Ind+Prt:strøk     # ;
      stryke+V+Ind+Prt:strøyk    # ;
       stryke+V+PrfPtc:strøket   # ;
       stryke+V+PrsPtc:strykende # ;

LEXICON STÅ
          stå+V+Inf:stå     # ;
          stå+V+Imp:stå     # ;
      stå+V+Ind+Prs:står    # ;
 stå+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:stås    # ;
      stå+V+Ind+Prt:stod    # ;
      stå+V+Ind+Prt:sto     # ;
       stå+V+PrfPtc:stått   # ;
       stå+V+PrsPtc:stående # ;

LEXICON STØKKE
          støkke+V+Inf:støkke    # ;
          støkke+V+Imp:støkk     # ;
      støkke+V+Ind+Prs:støkker   # ;
 støkke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:støkkes   # ;
      støkke+V+Ind+Prt:støkk     # ;
       støkke+V+PrfPtc:støkket   # ;
       støkke+V+PrsPtc:støkkende # ;

LEXICON SVELTE
          svelte+V+Inf:svelte    # ;
          svelte+V+Imp:svelt     # ;
      svelte+V+Ind+Prs:svelter   # ;
 svelte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sveltes   # ;
      svelte+V+Ind+Prt:svalt     # ;
       svelte+V+PrfPtc:sveltet   # ;
       svelte+V+PrsPtc:sveltende # ;

LEXICON SVERGE
          sverge+V+Inf:sverge    # ;
          sverge+V+Imp:sverg     # ;
      sverge+V+Ind+Prs:sverger   # ;
 sverge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sverges   # ;
      sverge+V+Ind+Prt:sverget   # ;
       sverge+V+PrfPtc:sverget   # ;
       sverge+V+PrsPtc:svergende # ;

LEXICON SVI
          svi+V+Inf:svi     # ;
          svi+V+Imp:svi     # ;
      svi+V+Ind+Prs:svir    # ;
 svi+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svis    # ;
      svi+V+Ind+Prt:sved    # ;
      svi+V+Ind+Prt:svei    # ;
       svi+V+PrfPtc:svidd   # ;
       svi+V+PrsPtc:sviende # ;

LEXICON SVIKE
             svike+V+Inf:svike    # ;
             svike+V+Imp:svik     # ;
         svike+V+Ind+Prs:sviker   # ;
    svike+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svikes   # ;
         svike+V+Ind+Prt:svek     # ;
 svike+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:sveik    # ;
          svike+V+PrfPtc:sveket   # ;
          svike+V+PrsPtc:svikende # ;

LEXICON SVINGE
          svinge+V+Inf:svinge    # ;
          svinge+V+Imp:sving     # ;
      svinge+V+Ind+Prs:svinger   # ;
 svinge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svinges   # ;
      svinge+V+Ind+Prt:svingte   # ;
      svinge+V+Ind+Prt:svang     # ;
       svinge+V+PrfPtc:svingt    # ;
       svinge+V+PrfPtc:svungrt   # ;
       svinge+V+PrsPtc:svingende # ;

LEXICON SVINNE
          svinne+V+Inf:svinne    # ;
          svinne+V+Imp:svinn     # ;
      svinne+V+Ind+Prs:svinner   # ;
 svinne+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svinnes   # ;
      svinne+V+Ind+Prt:svant     # ;
       svinne+V+PrfPtc:svunnet   # ;
       svinne+V+PrsPtc:svinnende # ;

LEXICON SVIVE
          svive+V+Inf:svive    # ;
          svive+V+Imp:sviv     # ;
      svive+V+Ind+Prs:sviver   # ;
 svive+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:svives   # ;
      svive+V+Ind+Prt:svivet   # ;
       svive+V+PrfPtc:svivet   # ;
       svive+V+PrsPtc:svivende # ;

LEXICON SYNGE
          synge+V+Inf:synge    # ;
          synge+V+Imp:syng     # ;
      synge+V+Ind+Prs:synger   # ;
 synge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:synges   # ;
      synge+V+Ind+Prt:sang     # ;
       synge+V+PrfPtc:sunget   # ;
       synge+V+PrsPtc:syngende # ;

LEXICON SYNKE
          synke+V+Inf:synke    # ;
          synke+V+Imp:synk     # ;
      synke+V+Ind+Prs:synker   # ;
 synke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:synkes   # ;
      synke+V+Ind+Prt:sank     # ;
       synke+V+PrfPtc:sunket   # ;
       synke+V+PrsPtc:synkende # ;

LEXICON SØKKE
          søkke+V+Inf:søkke    # ;
          søkke+V+Imp:søkk     # ;
      søkke+V+Ind+Prs:søkker   # ;
 søkke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:søkkes   # ;
      søkke+V+Ind+Prt:sakk     # ;
       søkke+V+PrfPtc:søkket   # ;
       søkke+V+PrsPtc:søkkende # ;

LEXICON TA
          ta+V+Inf:ta     # ;
          ta+V+Imp:ta     # ;
      ta+V+Ind+Prs:tar    # ;
 ta+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tas    # ;
      ta+V+Ind+Prt:tok    # ;
       ta+V+PrfPtc:tatt   # ;
       ta+V+PrsPtc:taende # ;

LEXICON TELLE
          telle+V+Inf:telle    # ;
          telle+V+Imp:tell     # ;
      telle+V+Ind+Prs:teller   # ;
 telle+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:telles   # ;
      telle+V+Ind+Prt:talte    # ;
       telle+V+PrfPtc:talt     # ;
       telle+V+PrsPtc:tellende # ;

LEXICON TIE
          tie+V+Inf:tie    # ;
          tie+V+Imp:ti     # ;
      tie+V+Ind+Prs:tier   # ;
 tie+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ties   # ;
      tie+V+Ind+Prt:tidde  # ;
       tie+V+PrfPtc:tidd   # ;
       tie+V+PrsPtc:tiende # ;

LEXICON TRE_V
          tre+V+Inf:tre     # ;
          tre+V+Imp:tre     # ;
      tre+V+Ind+Prs:trer    # ;
 tre+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tres    # ;
      tre+V+Ind+Prt:tredde  # ;
       tre+V+PrfPtc:tredd   # ;
       tre+V+PrsPtc:treende # ;

LEXICON TREFFE
          treffe+V+Inf:treffe    # ;
          treffe+V+Imp:treff     # ;
      treffe+V+Ind+Prs:treffer   # ;
 treffe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:treffes   # ;
      treffe+V+Ind+Prt:traff     # ;
       treffe+V+PrfPtc:truffet   # ;
       treffe+V+PrsPtc:treffende # ;

LEXICON TREKKE
          trekke+V+Inf:trekke    # ;
          trekke+V+Imp:trekk     # ;
      trekke+V+Ind+Prs:trekker   # ;
 trekke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trekkes   # ;
      trekke+V+Ind+Prt:trakk     # ;
       trekke+V+PrfPtc:trekt     # ;
       trekke+V+PrsPtc:trekkende # ;

LEXICON TRIVE
          trive+V+Inf:trive    # ;
          trive+V+Imp:triv     # ;
      trive+V+Ind+Prs:triver   # ;
 trive+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trives   # ;
      trive+V+Ind+Prt:treiv    # ;
       trive+V+PrfPtc:trevet   # ;
       trive+V+PrsPtc:trivende # ;

LEXICON TRYTE
          tryte+V+Inf:tryte    # ;
          tryte+V+Imp:tryt     # ;
      tryte+V+Ind+Prs:tryter   # ;
 tryte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trytes   # ;
      tryte+V+Ind+Prt:trøt     # ;
       tryte+V+PrfPtc:trytet   # ;
       tryte+V+PrsPtc:trytende # ;

LEXICON TRÅ
          trå+V+Inf:trå     # ;
          trå+V+Imp:trå     # ;
      trå+V+Ind+Prs:trår    # ;
 trå+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:trås    # ;
      trå+V+Ind+Prt:tro     # ;
      trå+V+Ind+Prt:trådde  # ;
       trå+V+PrfPtc:trådd   # ;
       trå+V+PrsPtc:trående # ;

LEXICON TVINGE
          tvinge+V+Inf:tvinge    # ;
          tvinge+V+Imp:tving     # ;
      tvinge+V+Ind+Prs:tvinger   # ;
 tvinge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tvinges   # ;
      tvinge+V+Ind+Prt:tvang     # ;
       tvinge+V+PrfPtc:tvunget   # ;
       tvinge+V+PrsPtc:tvingende # ;

LEXICON TYTE
             tyte+V+Inf:tyte    # ;
             tyte+V+Imp:tyt     # ;
         tyte+V+Ind+Prs:tyter   # ;
    tyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:tytes   # ;
         tyte+V+Ind+Prt:tøt     # ;
 tyte+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:tøyt    # ;
          tyte+V+PrfPtc:tytt    # ;
          tyte+V+PrsPtc:tytende # ;
