src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON irregular-verb
            be       STIGE   ;
            be       STIKKE  ;
            be       STJELE  ;
           fra       STJELE  ;
            be       STRIDE  ;
           kak       STRYKE  ;
            an       STÅ     ;
            av       STÅ     ;
            be       STÅ     ;
            bi       STÅ     ;
           for       STÅ     ;
          fore       STÅ     ;
          fram       STÅ     ;
          frem       STÅ     ;
          inne       STÅ     ;
           opp       STÅ     ;
            på       STÅ     ;
           til       STÅ     ;
            ut       STÅ     ;
           ved       STÅ     ;
           mot       STÅ     ;
            be       SYNGE   ;
           små       SYNGE   ;
           hen       SYNKE   ;
            an       TA      ;
            av       TA      ;
            be       TA      ;
           del       TA      ;
          fore       TA      ;
           fra       TA      ;
           fri       TA      ;
          gjen       TA      ;
           god       TA      ;
          iakt       TA      ;
           inn       TA      ;
         ivare       TA      ;
           mis       TA      ;
           mot       TA      ;
           opp       TA      ;
          over       TA      ;
            på       TA      ;
           unn       TA      ;
            ut       TA      ;
           ved       TA      ;
          vold       TA      ;
           for       TELLE   ;
       gjenfor       TELLE   ;
           for       TIE     ;
           for       TREKKE  ;
          fore       TREKKE  ;
          over       TREKKE  ;
           til       TREKKE  ;
           fra       TRE_V   ;
          fram       TRE_V   ;
           inn       TRE_V   ;
           opp       TRE_V   ;
       overtre:over  TRE_V   ;
           til       TRE_V   ;
            av       TVINGE  ;
            på       TVINGE  ;
           til       TVINGE  ;
LEXICON regular-verb
vare TA ;
gjenopp TA ;
overstige:over STIGE  ;
